Louisiana, session 2026, SB101.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
portion of Louisiana Highway 384, beginning at Big Diamond Disposal Road extending
to N. Precht Road, situated within Cameron Parish, is hereby designated as the "Daniel
Edward Didelot Memorial Highway".
Section 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
portion of Louisiana Highway 436, beginning at Louisiana Highway 21, extending to
E. Old Columbia Road, situated within Washington Parish, is hereby designated as the
"Bill "Bleu" Evans Memorial Highway".
Section 3. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of these designations provided local
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 101 ENROLLED
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual
costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.